en: Badminton set components included: Carrying bag; Grip tape; Net; Post; Racket; Shuttlecock; Other
pt-BR: Componentes do conjunto de badminton incluídos: Bolsa de transporte; Fita de grip; Rede; Poste; Raquete; Peteca; Outro
da: Inkluderede badmintonsætdele: Bæretaske; Griptape; Net; Stolpe; Ketsjer; Fjerbold; Andet
bg-BG: Включени компоненти на комплекта за бадминтон: Чанта за носене; Лента за дръжка; Мрежа; Стълб; Ракета; Перо; Друго
ja: バドミントンセットコンポーネント付き: キャリーバッグ; グリップテープ; ネット; ポスト; ラケット; シャトルコック; その他
tr: Badminton setindeki bileşenler.: Taşıma çantası; Grip bandı; Ağ; Direk; Raket; Tüytop; Diğer
vi: Các thành phần bộ cầu lông đi kèm: Túi đựng; Băng quấn cán; Lưới; Cột lưới; Vợt; Quả cầu lông; Khác
hr-HR: Uključene komponente kompleta za badminton: Torba za nošenje; Grip traka; Mreža; Stup; Reket; Loptica za badminton; Ostalo
lt-LT: Į badmintono rinkinį įeinančios sudedamosios dalys: Krepšys; Rankenos juosta; Tinklas; Stulpas; Raketė; Skrajukas; Kita
de: Enthaltene Komponenten des Badminton-Sets: Tragetasche; Griffband; Netz; Pfosten; Schläger; Federball; Sonstige
fr: Composants inclus dans le kit de badminton: Sac de transport; Bande antidérapante; Filet; Poteau; Raquette; Volant; Autre
sv: Komponenter som ingår i badmintonsetet: Bärväska; Grepptejp; Nät; Stolpe; Racket; Fjäderboll; Övrigt
es: Componentes del juego de bádminton incluidos: Bolsa de transporte; Cinta de agarre; Red; Poste; Raqueta; Volante; Otro
sk-SK: Súčasťou balenia sú komponenty súpravy na bedminton: Taška na prenášanie; Omotávka; Sieť; Stĺpik; Raketa; Košík; Iné
zh-TW: 包含羽毛球組組件: 提袋; 握把布; 球網; 網柱; 球拍; 羽毛球; 其他
hu: A tollaslabda-készlet tartalma: Hordtáska; Markolatszalag; Háló; Oszlop; Ütő; Tollaslabda; Egyéb
sl-SI: Priložene komponente kompleta za badminton: Torba za prenašanje; Trak za ročaj; Mreža; Steber; Lopar; Žogica za badminton; Drugo
nb: Badmintonsettkomponenter inkludert: Bæreveske; Grepteip; Nett; Stolpe; Racket; Fjærball; Annet
th: อุปกรณ์ที่รวมมาในชุดแบดมินตัน: กระเป๋าพกพา; เทปพันด้าม; ตาข่าย; เสา; ไม้แร็กเก็ต; ลูกขนไก่; อื่นๆ
el: Περιλαμβάνονται επιμέρους προϊόντα σετ μπάντμιντον: Τσάντα μεταφοράς; Ταινία λαβής; Δίχτυ; Ορθοστάτης; Ρακέτα; Φτερό; Άλλο
pl: Elementy zestawu do badmintona w komplecie: Torba transportowa; Owijka; Siatka; Słupek; Rakieta; Lotka; Inne
pt-PT: Componentes do conjunto de badminton incluídos: Saco de transporte; Fita de aderência; Rede; Poste; Raquete; Volante; Outro
fi: Mukana tulevat sulkapallosetin osat: Kantokassi; Grip-teippi; Verkko; Tolppa; Maila; Sulkapallo; Muu
ru: Компоненты набора для бадминтона: Сумка-переноска; Обмотка для ручки; Сетка; Стойка; Ракетка; Волан; Другое
ro-RO: Componente incluse în setul de badminton: Geantă de transport; Bandă de prindere; Plasă; Stâlp; Rachetă; Fluturaș; Altele
ko: 배드민턴 세트 포함 구성품: 휴대용 가방; 그립 테이프; 네트; 포스트; 라켓; 셔틀콕; 기타
it: Componenti del set da badminton inclusi: Borsa per il trasporto; Nastro per impugnatura; Rete; Palo; Racchetta; Volano; Altro
nl: Badmintonset meegeleverde onderdelen: Draagtas; Griptape; Net; Paal; Racket; Shuttle; Overig
zh-CN: 包括羽毛球套装组件: 手提袋; 握把带; 球网; 网柱; 球拍; 羽毛球; 其他
cs: Součástí badmintonové sady přiloženy: Přenosná taška; Omotávka rukojeti; Síť; Sloupek; Raketa; Košíček; Jiné